Idaho, session 2025, S1137.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Veterans Services the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $21,800 $21,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $348,000 348,000
Veterans Home Endowment Income
Fund 100,300 $488,100 588,400
Federal Grant
Fund 852,000 0 0 852,000
TOTAL $1,200,000 $122,100 $488,100 $1,810,200
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other appropriation provided by law to
the contrary, the appropriation made to the Division of Veterans Services is
hereby reduced by the following amounts in operating expenditures from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue Fund $348,000
Federal Grant Fund 753,200
TOTAL $1,101,200


SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Division of Veterans Services any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the division from the Federal Grant
Fund not to exceed $111,488,600 for fiscal year 2025, to be used for nonre-
curring expenditures for the Boise Veterans Home and the Lewiston Veterans
Home for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the
State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amounts, by fund and ex-
pense class, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.